Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.470

Berries and small fruit.

Berries and small fruit shall be offered and exposed for sale and sold by weight, or by measure in open containers having capacities of one-half dry pint, one dry pint or one dry quart: PROVIDED, That the marking provisions of RCW 19.94.340 shall not apply to such dry volume containers.

[ 1969 c 67 s 47.]